Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 19

State Examining Boards—General Provisions

4-19-101. Retention of examination papers.

All state boards, except the board of law examiners, charged with the duty of giving examinations to determine the qualifications of individuals who seek to be licensed to engage in a special profession, position or business, are required to retain all examination papers for a period of at least one (1) year, during which time the examination papers will be subject to review upon request.

Acts 1965, ch. 349, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-1901.

Cross-References. Professional licensing and examining boards, titles 62, 63.

4-19-102. Applicants — Number of times examination may be taken.

No board, commission or agency of this state that issues licenses to persons to engage in an occupation, trade or profession based upon written or oral examination shall adopt or enforce any rule, regulation or law limiting the number of times that any person, otherwise qualified, may apply for and stand for such written or oral examination at any regular examination session regardless of the number of times such person has taken such examination.

This section shall specifically apply to the state board of law examiners.

Acts 1971, ch. 354, § 1; 1972, ch. 789, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-1902.

4-19-103. Accommodations for person taking examination for licensure.

As used in this section:

“Agency” has the same meaning as defined in § 4-5-102; and

“License” has the same meaning as defined in § 4-5-102.

An agency that requires a person applying for a license to engage in an occupation, trade, or profession in this state to take an examination shall ensure the provision of appropriate accommodations in accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.).

A state agency that administers a required examination for licensure shall promulgate rules to implement this section. The rules must:

Establish the eligibility criteria that a person must meet for an accommodation to be provided pursuant to this section; and

Be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

The requirements of this section do not apply to an examination mandated and administered pursuant to federal law.

Acts 2019, ch. 243, § 1.